dev/bm.adj.dix
<pardef n="p/ipe__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>epen</l>      <r>ipe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epet</l>      <r>ipe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epet</l>      <r>ipe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epne</l>      <r>ipe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epne</l>      <r>ipe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ipende</l>    <r>ipe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sm/yge__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>øgen</l>      <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øget</l>      <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øget</l>      <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øgne</l>      <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øgne</l>      <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ygende</l>    <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="l/juge__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>jugende</l>   <r>juge<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øyen</l>      <r>juge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øyet</l>      <r>juge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øyet</l>      <r>juge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øyne</l>      <r>juge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øyne</l>      <r>juge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="unnsl/eppe__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>eppende</l>   <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>upne</l>      <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>upne</l>      <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uppen</l>     <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uppet</l>     <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uppet</l>     <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sl/eppe__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>eppende</l>   <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epte</l>      <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epte</l>      <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ept</l>       <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ept</l>       <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>upne</l>      <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>upne</l>      <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uppen</l>     <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uppet</l>     <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uppet</l>     <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="nødig__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ere</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ym/is__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>isere</l>     <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iseste</l>    <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isest</l>     <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ist</l>       <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tr/e__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ådte</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådte</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådt</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådt</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edde</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edde</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edd</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edd</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edende</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eende</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="f/inne__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>innende</l>   <r>inne<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unnen</l>     <r>inne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unne</l>      <r>inne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unne</l>      <r>inne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unnet</l>     <r>inne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unnet</l>     <r>inne<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gin/e__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sov/e__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="drite">           <i>drit</i><par n="gin/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gjenfinne">       <i>gjenf</i><par n="f/inne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="avfinne">         <i>avf</i><par n="f/inne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="befinne">         <i>bef</i><par n="f/inne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gjenvinne">       <i>gjenv</i><par n="f/inne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forsvinne">       <i>forsv</i><par n="f/inne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="frifinne">        <i>frif</i><par n="f/inne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="besove">          <i>besov</i><par n="sov/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="finne">           <i>f</i><par n="f/inne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="halvsove">        <i>halvsov</i><par n="sov/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forsove">         <i>forsov</i><par n="sov/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gine">            <i>gin</i><par n="gin/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sove">            <i>sov</i><par n="sov/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="smyge">           <i>sm</i><par n="sm/yge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tre">             <i>tr</i><par n="tr/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="spinne">          <i>sp</i><par n="f/inne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="svinne">          <i>sv</i><par n="f/inne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utspinne">        <i>utsp</i><par n="f/inne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ymis">            <i>ym</i><par n="ym/is__adj"/></e>
<e lm="snorksove">       <i>snorksov</i><par n="sov/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="unnsleppe">       <i>unnsl</i><par n="unnsl/eppe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utvinne">         <i>utv</i><par n="f/inne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skjelve">         <i>skjelv</i><par n="sov/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sleppe">          <i>sl</i><par n="sl/eppe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="klinge">          <i>kling</i><par n="gin/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kreke">           <i>krek</i><par n="gin/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="opprinne">        <i>oppr</i><par n="f/inne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nødig">           <i>nødig</i><par n="nødig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rinne">           <i>r</i><par n="f/inne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kneste">          <i>knest</i><par n="sov/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kvede">           <i>kved</i><par n="sov/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="overvinne">       <i>overv</i><par n="f/inne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ljuge">           <i>l</i><par n="l/juge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="oppfinne">        <i>oppf</i><par n="f/inne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="innvinne">        <i>innv</i><par n="f/inne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="innfinne">        <i>innf</i><par n="f/inne__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pipe">            <i>p</i><par n="p/ipe__adj"/></e>
